Hawaii statutes.
[§189-15] Authority. The department of
land and natural resources may promulgate and enforce rules concerning the use
of fish aggregation devices deployed under the Statewide Fish Aggregating
System. The rules may include provisions that prohibit attaching, mooring, or
tying any boat or other watercraft to the fish aggregating devices, or
boarding, defacing, damaging, removing or destroying such devices; provided
that the department may engage in such activities as deemed necessary to
enhance the fish aggregating system. [L 1981, c 80, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next